Maryland, session 2025, SB0883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
16–202.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0883*

SENATE BILL 883
(E) (1) A PERSON HAS A LIEN ON A MOTOR VEHICLE IF THE PERSON TOWS
OR REMOVES THE MOTOR VEHICLE FROM A PRIVATELY OWNED PARKING LOT UNDER
TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 10A OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, ON BEHALF OF THE
PARKING LOT OWNER OR AGENT, FOR ANY CHARGE INCURRED FOR ANY:
(I) TOWING;
(II) RECOVERY;
(III) STORAGE; OR
(IV) NOTICE PROVIDED.
(2) A LIEN CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
EXTINGUISHED IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS RECLAIMED AND THE CHARGES GIVING
RISE TO THE LIEN ARE PAID BY:
(I) THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE LESSEE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(III) THE OPERATOR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(IV) THE INSURER OF RECORD;
(V) ANY SECURED PARTY; OR
(VI) ANY AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER.
(3) A LIEN IS CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WHEN ANY
CHARGES GIVING RISE TO THE LIEN ARE INCURRED.
(4) A LIEN CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBORDINATE TO A
SECURITY INTEREST THAT PREDATES THE CREATION OF THE LIEN.
(a) There is a Post–Towing Procedure Workgroup.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;

SENATE BILL 883 3
(3) one representative of the Consumer Protection Division in the Office of
the Attorney General, appointed by the Attorney General;
(4) one representative of the Maryland Association of Counties, designated
by the Executive Director of the Association;
(5) two representatives of the Towing and Recovery Professionals of
Maryland, designated by the President of the organization;
(6) one representative of the Maryland Retailers Alliance, designated by
the President of the Alliance;
(7) one representative of the Maryland Multi–Housing Association,
designated by the Executive Director of the Association; and
(8) one representative of the Apartment and Office Building Association of
Metropolitan Washington, designated by the chair of the Association.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Department of Commerce shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) (1) The Workgroup shall, in consultation with interested stakeholders,
identify and examine post–towing procedures relating to the towing or removal of motor
vehicles from privately owned parking lots in accordance with Title 21, Subtitle 10A of the
Transportation Article.
(2) In conducting the examination under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the Workgroup shall also formulate recommendations on what measures would need to be
in place or required to comply with due process requirements under State and federal law
in order to establish a legally enforceable possessory or statutory lien as part of post–towing
procedures, including any notice requirements.
(g) On or before December 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at

SENATE BILL 883
the end of June 30, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.